Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1483
Donated food; resale prohibited; violation; penalty.

(1) It shall be unlawful for any person or charitable or nonprofit organization receiving food pursuant to section 25-21,189 to sell or offer to sell such food.

(2) Violation of the provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall be a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1981, LB 38, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1981), § 81-217.31;

Laws 1987, LB 201, § 2.